Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.8321

Background checks—Dissemination of conviction record information.

When the Washington state patrol disseminates conviction record information in response to a request under RCW 43.43.832, it shall clearly state that: (1) The conviction record data does not include information on civil adjudications, administrative findings, or disciplinary board final decisions and that all such information must be obtained from the courts and licensing agencies; (2) the conviction record includes any criminal history record information which pertains to an incident that occurred within the last twelve months for which a person is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final discharge from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without restriction; and (3) an arrest is not a conviction or a finding of guilt.

[ 2012 c 125 s 5; 2005 c 421 s 10.]